Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 20
LEASES OF LIVESTOCK

Sec.

§ 25-2001. Leases to be in writing and recorded.

All leases of more than ten (10) head of livestock must be in writing and must be acknowledged in like manner as grants of real property, and recorded in the county recorder’s office or offices, for the same fee as required by section 31-3205, Idaho Code; and the failure to comply with the provisions of this section renders the interest of the lessor in the property subject and subsequent to the claims of creditors of the lessee, and of subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers of the property in good faith and for value.

History.

1907, p. 481, § 1; reen. R.C. & C.L., § 1263; C.S., § 1955; I.C.A.,§ 24-1701; am. 1984, ch. 116, § 1, p. 261.